Virginia statutes. Title 21. Drainage, Soil Conservation, Sanitation and Public Facilities Districts.
Article 7. Powers and Duties of Counties, Cities and Towns.

§ 21-214.
Plans, maps, etc., to be available to commission.

Each county, city or town in whole or in part embraced within a district shall, at the request of the commission, make available to the commission or the agents or employees thereof, any or all maps, plans, specifications, records, books, accounts or other data or things deemed necessary by the commission in the exercise of its powers and duties under this chapter.

History.

1938, p. 526; Michie Code 1942, § 1560bbb.

§ 21-215.
Payments by county, city or town.

Each county, city, town or other public body shall promptly pay to any commission all fees, rents and charges which the commission may charge to it as owner or lessee or tenant of real estate in accordance with §

21-180

, and shall provide for the payment thereof in the same manner as other obligations of such county, city, town or public body.

History.

1938, p. 527; Michie Code 1942, § 1560bbb.

§ 21-216.
Contracts with counties, cities and towns outside of district.

Any commission, and any county, city or town in whole or in part outside of the district, is authorized to enter into a contract on such terms and conditions as such contract may contain, providing for or relating to the treatment and disposal of sewage or industrial wastes originating in such county, city or town, by means of the sewage disposal system or such other facilities as the commission may determine to provide for such purpose, and such county, city or town is authorized to do everything necessary or proper to carry out and perform every such contract and to provide for the payment or discharge of any obligation thereunder by the same means and in the same manner as any other of its obligations.

In the event any such contract is entered into in accordance with the provisions of this section, provision shall be made therein whereby the cost of rendering the services herein referred to, to such county, city or town, will be borne by such county, city or town.

History.

1938, p. 527; Michie Code 1942, § 1560bbb.

§ 21-217.
Powers conferred on counties, cities and towns in addition to other powers.

The powers conferred by this chapter on counties, cities and towns are in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law, and may be exercised by resolution of the governing bodies thereof without regard to the terms, conditions, requirements, restrictions or other provisions contained in any other law, general or special, or in any charter, except that where fees, rents and charges are fixed by a city or town, that power shall be exercised by ordinance.

History.

1938, p. 527; Michie Code 1942, § 1560bbb.